Illinois, session 104th, HB5117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $15,000,000, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 6Public Health from the General Revenue Fund for continued 7funding to the Illinois Association of Free and Charitable 8Clinics for grants and other expenses of free and charitable 9clinics to provide care or make referrals for uninsured or 10underinsured people living with acute and chronic health 11issues, including, but not limited to, medical health care, 12behavioral health care, oral health care, outreach, health 13education, screening and testing, medication and related 14expenses, disease prevention, and vaccinations. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162026.